District of Columbia statutes.
22-3227.07

Limitations.

Obtaining, creating, possessing, and using a person’s personal identifying information in violation of this subchapter shall constitute a single scheme or course of conduct, and the applicable period of limitation under § 23-113 shall not begin to run until after the scheme or course of conduct has been completed or terminated.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 127g
as added Mar. 27, 2004, D.C. Law 15-106, § 2(c), 50 DCR 9809
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(c) of Identity Thief Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-388, March 18, 2004, 51 DCR 3382).